Louisiana, session 2026, SB458.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
7 Section 1. R.S. 33:9612.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
8 §9612.2. Allocation of funds; local ethics entities; St. Tammany Parish
9 Any tax levied and imposed by St. Tammany Parish for a local ethics
10 entity may be allocated by the entity to any local agency under the jurisdiction
11 of the entity to ensure compliance with state law.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.